Utah statutes.
40-8-17.   Responsibility of operator to comply with applicable rules, regulations and ordinances -- Inspections.

(1) The approval of a notice of intention shall not relieve the operator from responsibility to comply with all other applicable statutes, rules, regulations, and ordinances, including but not limited to, those applying to safety, air and water pollution, and public liability and property damage.

(2)  As a condition of consideration and approval of a notice of intention, each applicant or operator under a notice of intention shall permit members of the board, the division, or other state agency having lawful interest in the administration of this act, to have the right, at all reasonable times, to enter the affected land and all related properties included in the notice of intention, whether or not approved, to make inspections for the purposes of this act.

